Hawaii, session 2025, SB1646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a shortage of primary care physicians in the State.  The shortage is partly due to Hawaii's high cost of living and business costs.  The legislature further finds that a consistent funding stream would help primary care providers stay afloat and continue operating. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to create a consistent funding source for primary care providers. SECTION 2. (a)  As soon as practicable, during the next negotiation with health insurance carriers from the effective date of this Act, the Hawaii employer-union benefits trust fund board of trustees shall ensure that all offered health plans provide twelve per cent of monthly insurance premium payments directly to each respective member-patient's primary care provider. (b)  As soon as practicable, pursuant to federal and state law, the department of human services med-QUEST division shall allocate twelve per cent of monthly insurance premium payments directly to each respective member-patient's primary care provider. (c) The percentage of monthly insurance premium payments described in subsections (a) and (b) shall be paid to primary care providers automatically each month without regard to actual services provided. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________